Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-320.01
Voter registration application; distribution by mail; requirements; applicability.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person or organization distributing voter registration applications by mail shall:

(a) Use the form prescribed by the Secretary of State. The form shall contain on the top of the first page in bold type (i) the identity of the person or organization distributing the form and (ii) the following statements:

You may submit this form if you wish to register to vote or update your voter registration. You do not need to complete this form if you have already registered to vote; and

(b) If enclosing a return envelope, have either a blank address or the address of the election commissioner or county clerk printed on the envelope.

(2) This section shall not apply to voter registration applications distributed by the Secretary of State, an election commissioner, a county clerk, the State Department of Education, the Department of Health and Human Services, or the Department of Motor Vehicles.

Laws 2022, LB843, § 17;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 16.